California statutes. Public Resources Code
Before any park or recreational area developmental plan is made, the department shall cause to be made a land carrying capacity survey of the proposed park or recreational area, including in such survey such factors as soil, moisture, and natural cover.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. The Parks Project Revolving Fund [5019.10. - 5019.14.]

5019.10.

(a) The Parks Project Revolving Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Except as otherwise specified in this section, upon approval of the Department of Finance there shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the fund all money appropriated, contributed, or made available from any source, including sources other than state appropriations, for expenditure on work within the powers and duties of the department with respect to the construction, alteration, repair, and improvement of state park facilities, including, but not limited to, services, new construction, major construction and equipment, minor construction, maintenance, improvements, and equipment, and other building and improvement projects for which an appropriation is made or, as to funds from sources other than
 state appropriations, as may be authorized by written agreement between the contributor or contributors of funds and the department and approved by the Department of Finance.

(b) Money from state sources transferred to, or deposited in, the fund for major construction shall be limited to the amount necessary based on receipt of competitive bids. Money transferred for this purpose shall be upon the approval of the Department of Finance. Any amount available, in the state appropriation, that is in excess of the amount necessary based on receipt of competitive bids, shall be immediately transferred to the credit of the fund from which the appropriation was made. Money in the fund also may be expended, upon approval of the Department of Finance, to finance the cost of a construction project within the powers and duties of the department for which the federal government will contribute a partial cost thereof, if written evidence has been received
 from a federal agency indicating that money has been appropriated by Congress and the federal government, and that the federal government will pay to the state the amount specified upon the completion of construction of the project. The director may approve plans, specifications, and estimates of cost, and advertise for and receive bids on, those projects in anticipation of the receipt of the written evidence. Money transferred or deposited for the purposes of this subdivision is continuously appropriated to, and available for expenditure by, the department for the purposes for which it is appropriated, contributed, or made available, without regard to fiscal years and irrespective of the provisions of Section 13340 of the Government Code.

(c) As used in this article, “fund” means the Parks Project Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 140.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.11.

The department shall file against the fund all claims covering expenditures incurred in connection with services, new construction, major construction and equipment, minor construction, maintenance, improvements, and equipment, and other building and improvement projects, and the Controller shall draw his or her warrant therefor against that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 140.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.12.

The department shall keep a record of all expenditures chargeable against each specific portion of the fund. Any unencumbered balance in any portion of the fund, either within three months after completion of the project for which the portion was transferred or within three years from the time the portion was transferred or deposited therein, whichever is earlier, shall be withdrawn from the fund and transferred to the credit of the fund from which the appropriation was made. As to funds from other than state appropriations, they shall be paid out or refunded as provided in the agreement relating to the contributions. The Department of Finance may approve an extension of the time of withdrawal. For the purpose of this section, an estimate, prepared by the department upon receipt of bids, of the amount
 required for supervision, engineering, and other items, if any, necessary for the completion of a project, on which a construction contract has been awarded, shall be deemed a valid encumbrance and shall be included with any other valid encumbrances in determining the amount of an unencumbered balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 140.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.13.

At any time, the department, without furnishing a voucher or itemized statement, may withdraw from the fund a sum not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). Any sum withdrawn pursuant to this section shall be used as a revolving fund when payments of compensation earned or cash advances are necessary with respect to the construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of state park facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 140.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.14.

The department shall annually submit to the Department of Finance a report that reconciles, by project, all of the following:

(a) Amounts transferred to the fund.

(b) Amounts expended from the fund.

(c) In cases of project savings or completion, or both, unexpended amounts withdrawn from the fund and transferred to the credit of the fund, paid out, or refunded, as provided in Section 5019.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 140.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Classification of Units of the State Park System [5019.50. - 5019.80.]

5019.50.

All units that are or shall become a part of the state park system, except those units or parts of units designated by the Legislature as wilderness areas pursuant to Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 5093.30), or where subject to any other provision of law, including Section 5019.80 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 36600) of Chapter 7 of Division 27, shall be classified by the State Park and Recreation Commission into one of the categories specified in this article. Classification of state marine reserves, state marine parks, and state marine conservation areas, requires the concurrence of the Fish and Game Commission for restrictions to be placed upon the use of living marine resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.53.

State parks consist of relatively spacious areas of outstanding scenic or natural character, oftentimes also containing significant historical, archaeological, ecological, geological, or other similar values. The purpose of state parks shall be to preserve outstanding natural, scenic, and cultural values, indigenous aquatic and terrestrial fauna and flora, and the most significant examples of ecological regions of California, such as the Sierra Nevada, northeast volcanic, great valley, coastal strip, Klamath-Siskiyou Mountains, southwest mountains and valleys, redwoods, foothills and low coastal mountains, and desert and desert mountains.

Each state park shall be managed as a composite whole in order to restore, protect, and maintain its native environmental complexes to the extent compatible with the primary purpose for which the park was established.

Improvements undertaken within state parks shall be for the purpose of making the areas available for public enjoyment and education in a manner consistent with the preservation of natural, scenic, cultural, and ecological values for present and future generations. Improvements may be undertaken to provide for recreational activities including, but not limited to, camping, picnicking, sightseeing, nature study, hiking, and horseback riding, so long as those improvements involve no major modification of lands, forests, or waters. Improvements that do not directly enhance the public’s enjoyment of the natural, scenic, cultural, or ecological values of the resource, which are attractions in themselves, or which are otherwise available to the public within a reasonable distance outside the park, shall not be undertaken within state parks.

State parks may be established in the terrestrial or nonmarine aquatic (lake or stream) environments of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.56.

State recreation units consist of areas selected, developed, and operated to provide outdoor recreational opportunities. The units shall be designated by the commission by naming, in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 5001) and this article relating to classification.

In the planning of improvements to be undertaken within state recreation units, consideration shall be given to compatibility of design with the surrounding scenic and environmental characteristics.

State recreation units may be established in the terrestrial or nonmarine aquatic (lake or stream) environments of the state and shall be further classified as one of the following types:

(a) State recreation areas, consisting of areas selected and developed to provide multiple recreational opportunities to meet other than purely local needs. The areas shall be selected for their having terrain capable of withstanding extensive human impact and for their proximity to large population centers, major routes of travel, or proven recreational resources such as manmade or natural bodies of water. Areas containing ecological, geological, scenic, or cultural resources of significant value shall be preserved within state wildernesses, state reserves, state parks, or natural or cultural preserves, or, for those areas situated seaward of the mean high tide line, shall be designated state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, or state marine cultural preservation areas.

Improvements may be undertaken to provide for recreational activities, including, but not limited to, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling, horseback riding, boating, waterskiing, diving, winter sports, fishing, and hunting.

Improvements to provide for urban or indoor formalized recreational activities shall not be undertaken within state recreation areas.

(b) Underwater recreation areas, consisting of areas in the nonmarine aquatic (lake or stream) environment selected and developed to provide surface and subsurface water-oriented recreational opportunities, while preserving basic resource values for present and future generations.

(c) State beaches, consisting of areas with frontage on the ocean, or bays designed to provide swimming, boating, fishing, and other beach-oriented recreational activities. Coastal areas containing ecological, geological, scenic, or cultural resources of significant value shall be preserved within state wildernesses, state reserves, state parks, or natural or cultural preserves, or, for those areas situated seaward of the mean high tide line, shall be designated state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, or state marine cultural preservation areas.

(d) Wayside campgrounds, consisting of relatively small areas suitable for overnight camping and offering convenient access to major highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.59.

Historical units, to be named appropriately and individually, consist of nonmarine areas established primarily to preserve objects of historical, archaeological, and scientific interest, and archaeological sites and places commemorating important persons or historic events. The areas should be of sufficient size, where possible, to encompass a significant proportion of the landscape associated with the historical objects. The only facilities that may be provided are those required for the safety, comfort, and enjoyment of the visitors, such as access, parking, water, sanitation, interpretation, and picnicking. Upon approval by the commission, lands outside the primary historic zone may be selected or acquired, developed, or operated to provide camping facilities within appropriate historical units. Upon approval by the State Park and Recreation Commission, an area outside the primary historic zone may be designated as a recreation zone to provide limited recreational opportunities that will supplement the public’s enjoyment of the unit. Certain agricultural, mercantile, or other commercial activities may be permitted if those activities are a part of the history of the individual unit and any developments retain or restore historical authenticity. Historical units shall be named to perpetuate the primary historical theme of the individual units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.62.

State seashores consist of relatively spacious coastline areas with frontage on the ocean, or on bays open to the ocean, including water areas landward of the mean high tide line and seasonally connected to the ocean, possessing outstanding scenic or natural character and significant recreational, historical, archaeological, or geological values.

The purpose of state seashores shall be to preserve outstanding natural, scenic, cultural, ecological, and recreational values of the California coastline as an ecological region and to make possible the enjoyment of coastline and related recreational activities which are consistent with the preservation of the principal values and which contribute to the public enjoyment, appreciation, and understanding of those values.

Improvements undertaken within state seashores shall be for the purpose of making the areas available for public enjoyment, recreation, and education in a manner consistent with the perpetuation of their natural, scenic, cultural, ecological, and recreational value. Improvements which do not directly enhance the public enjoyment of the natural, scenic, cultural, ecological, or recreational values of the seashore, or which are attractions in themselves, shall not be undertaken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.65.

State reserves consist of areas embracing outstanding natural or scenic characteristics or areas containing outstanding cultural resources of statewide significance. State reserve units may be established in the terrestrial or nonmarine aquatic (lake or stream) environments of the state and shall be further classified as one of the following types:

(a) State natural reserves, consisting of areas selected and managed for the purpose of preserving their native ecological associations, unique faunal or floral characteristics, geological features, and scenic qualities in a condition of undisturbed integrity. Resource manipulation shall be restricted to the minimum required to negate the deleterious influence of man.

Improvements undertaken shall be for the purpose of making the areas available, on a day use basis, for public enjoyment and education in a manner consistent with the preservation of their natural features. Living and nonliving resources contained within state natural reserves shall not be disturbed or removed for other than scientific or management purposes.

(b) State cultural reserves, consisting of areas selected and managed for the purpose of preserving and protecting the integrity of places that contain historic or prehistoric structures, villages, or settlements, archaeological features, ruins, artifacts, inscriptions made by humans, burial grounds, landscapes, hunting or gathering sites, or similar evidence of past human lives or cultures. These areas may also be places of spiritual significance to California Native Americans. Within state cultural reserves, the highest level of resource protection shall be sought. Improvements may be undertaken for the purpose of providing public access, enjoyment, and education, and for cultural resource protection. Improvements made for the purpose of cultural resource protection shall take into account the possible need for access to the site for ceremonial or spiritual purposes. Living and nonliving resources contained within state cultural reserves may be used for ceremonial or spiritual purposes, consistent with other laws, and if the use is not harmful to threatened or endangered species or to the cultural resources intended for protection by this designation. Management actions shall be consistent with the preservation of cultural resources and with federal and state laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.68.

State wildernesses, in contrast with those areas where man and his own works dominate the landscape, are hereby recognized as areas where the earth and its community of life are untrammeled by man and where man himself is a visitor who does not remain. A state wilderness is further defined to mean an area of relatively undeveloped state-owned or leased land which has retained its primeval character and influence or has been substantially restored to a near-natural appearance, without permanent improvements or human habitation, other than semi-improved campgrounds, or structures which existed at the time of classification of the area as a state wilderness and which the State Park and Recreation Commission has determined may be maintained and used in a manner compatible with the preservation of the wilderness environment, or primitive latrines, which is protected and managed so as to preserve its natural conditions, and which:

(a) Appears generally to have been affected primarily by the forces of nature, with the imprint of man’s work substantially unnoticeable.

(b) Has outstanding opportunities for solitude or a primitive and unconfined type of recreation.

(c) Consists of at least 5,000 acres of land, either by itself or in combination with contiguous areas possessing wilderness characteristics, or is of sufficient size as to make practicable its preservation and use in an unimpaired condition.

(d) May also contain ecological, geological, or other features of scientific, educational, scenic, or historical value.

State wildernesses may be established within the boundaries of other state park system units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1234, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.71.

Natural preserves consist of distinct nonmarine areas of outstanding natural or scientific significance established within the boundaries of other state park system units. The purpose of natural preserves shall be to preserve such features as rare or endangered plant and animal species and their supporting ecosystems, representative examples of plant or animal communities existing in California prior to the impact of civilization, geological features illustrative of geological processes, significant fossil occurrences or geological features of cultural or economic interest, or topographic features illustrative of representative or unique biogeographical patterns. Areas set aside as natural preserves shall be of sufficient size to allow, where possible, the natural dynamics of ecological interaction to continue without interference, and to provide, in all cases, a practicable management unit. Habitat manipulation shall be permitted only in those areas found by scientific analysis to require manipulation to preserve the species or associations that constitute the basis for the establishment of the natural preserve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.74.

Cultural preserves consist of distinct nonmarine areas of outstanding cultural interest established within the boundaries of other state park system units for the purpose of protecting such features as sites, buildings, or zones which represent significant places or events in the flow of human experience in California. Areas set aside as cultural preserves shall be large enough to provide for the effective protection of the prime cultural resources from potentially damaging influences, and to permit the effective management and interpretation of the resources. Within cultural preserves, complete integrity of the cultural resources shall be sought, and no structures or improvements that conflict with that integrity shall be permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.80.

(a) The Marine Managed Areas Improvement Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 36600) of Division 27) establishes a uniform classification system for state marine managed areas and is incorporated herein by reference. Any proposals for marine managed areas made after January 1, 2002, shall follow the guidelines set forth in that act. Pursuant to Section 36750, existing marine or estuarine areas within units of the state park system that have not been reclassified in accordance with the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) on January 1, 2002, shall be reclassified by the State Interagency Coordinating Committee into one of the following classifications:

(1) State marine reserve.

(2) State marine park.

(3) State marine conservation area.

(4) State marine cultural preservation area.

(5) State marine recreational management area.

(b) The process for establishing, deleting, or modifying state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, state marine cultural preservation areas, and state marine recreational management areas shall be established pursuant to that act. The restrictions and allowable uses applicable to those areas are as set forth in that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.8. California State Park Stewardship Act of 2012 [5019.90. - 5019.92.]

5019.90.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California State Park Stewardship Act of 2012.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.91.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s state parks are an essential part of California’s unique heritage, and protect important natural, cultural, and historical resources of great value to all Californians.

(b) The mission of the California State Park system is to provide for the health, inspiration, and education of the people of California by helping to preserve the state’s extraordinary biological diversity, protecting its most valued natural and cultural resources, and creating opportunities for high-quality outdoor recreation. State parks are set aside to protect their natural, historical, cultural, and recreational
 values in perpetuity for the people of the state.

(c) California state parks are vital to the quality of life in California and are a major draw for tourism in the state, generating billions of dollars in annual economic activity in communities near state parks and in park-related expenditures. The economic activity generated by state parks helps sustain small businesses and jobs in local communities near state parks and generates significant tax revenue for the state.

(d) The budget for state parks has not kept pace with population growth and growing demand. The annual budget for state parks has been significantly below the amount necessary to maintain state parks in their current condition. State General Fund revenue for state parks declined by over 37 percent between fiscal years 2007–08 and 2012–13, inclusive. The ongoing shortfall has resulted in a deferred maintenance
 backlog of over one billion three hundred million dollars ($1,300,000,000) by 2010, inadequate staff to protect park resources and maintain public access and safety, and partial closures of many state parks. The state park system cannot sustain further cuts in funding and remain viable.

(e) After additional budget cuts were proposed by the Governor and approved by the Legislature in the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Governor’s administration announced its intent to close up to 70 state parks by July 2012.

(f) It is imperative that the state commit to a long-term goal of adequately and sustainably funding and maintaining California’s state park system to protect these irreplaceable resources and to preserve California’s legacy for the benefit of all Californians. To this end, it is necessary that the state identify new revenue strategies that will move the state toward that goal, and
 affirm a state policy that park closures are to occur only as a last resort, and only after all reasonable alternatives have been pursued.

(g) To fully realize the potential of nonprofit, philanthropic, and other public and nongovernmental partnerships that can help sustain a world class state park system in California, it is imperative that the Legislature and the Governor ensure an adequate level of state funding for state parks is maintained in the future and that new revenues received from private sector donors are used to supplement, and not to supplant, existing state funding.

(h) It is therefore the policy of the Legislature that a master plan for state parks be formed that will do all of the following:

(1) Ensure long-term adequate funding and maintenance of California’s state park system by, among other
 things, ensuring accurate and transparent accounting and disclosure of all state special funds available for support of state parks, identifying new revenues and fundraising strategies to sustain state parks, and ensuring that those new sources are not used to supplant existing state support for state parks or to justify further reductions in General Fund support that would leave the park system unsustainable.

(2) Ensure that any new revenues received from private donors for the support of state parks are used to supplement, and not to supplant, existing state funding for state parks and are used only for the purposes for which they are given.

(3) Ensure greater efficiency in the management of state parks, including enhancing the collection of existing fees and other revenue generating potential at state parks, while maintaining
 public access for all Californians.

(4) Minimize the number of parks subject to closure in future years and encourage creative partnerships to assist the state with park operations and management.

(i) It is further the policy of the Legislature to promote formation of a multidisciplinary advisory council, including, but not limited to, members of the public, persons with park management expertise, representatives of nonprofit park organizations, and representatives of the private philanthropic community, to conduct an independent assessment and make recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor on future management, planning, and funding proposals that will ensure the long-term sustainability of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.92.

(a) The department shall develop a prioritized action plan to increase revenues and collection of user fees at state parks. The plan shall include strategies for generating new revenues and fee collection methodologies at state parks and may include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Installation of modern fee collection technologies and equipment at state parks such as kiosks that accept credit cards and automatic entrance gates, where appropriate.

(2) Implementation of peak demand pricing at popular campgrounds and other high-demand park facilities.

(3) Assessment of appropriate fees at all state park units.

(4) Offering of additional mission-appropriate fee-for-service amenities with revenue generating potential at select parks where consistent with park unit general plans. Those amenities may include, but are not limited to, installation of additional recreational vehicle spaces to expand campground capacity at heavily used parks where natural resource needs and space availability allow, installation of upgraded overnight options such as cabins, where feasible, and rental of park facilities for special events.

(5) Promotion and marketing of an “adopt a park” or systemwide state park sponsorship program to encourage private donations in support of state parks, with appropriate recognition to be given to donors consistent with state park policies and mission.

(6) Design, promotion, and marketing of a new state park annual access pass system with incentives to encourage increased voluntary purchases of state park access passes, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Offering of different regional and seasonal options for annual passes.

(B) Providing multiple opportunities for the purchase of annual passes, including at state park entrances and through partnerships with retail outlets, and on state tax returns.

(C) Offering of incentives such as free midweek off-peak season camping passes with the purchase of an annual pass if purchased during the first three months of the year.

(D) Offering of opportunities for purchasers to make a voluntary additional contribution
 that would be dedicated to support of a particular category of state parks, such as the state’s iconic redwood parks and historical parks that require funding over and above that generated by user fees to sustain the parks in good condition.

(b) The department shall report to the Legislature and the Governor on the prioritized action plan required to be developed pursuant to subdivision (a) by July 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Historical Resources [5020. - 5029.7.]

5020.

The Historical Landmarks Advisory Committee is continued in existence as the State Historical Resources Commission. Any reference in any law to the Historical Landmarks Advisory Committee shall be deemed to refer to the State Historical Resources Commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.1.

As used in this article:

(a) “California Register” means the California Register of Historical Resources.

(b) “Certified local government” means a local government that has been certified by the National Park Service to carry out the purposes of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 470 et seq.) as amended, pursuant to Section 101(c) of that act and the regulations adopted under the act which are set forth in Part 61 (commencing with Section 61.1) of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Commission” means the State Historical Resources Commission.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(e) “Director” means the Director of Parks and Recreation.

(f) “DPR Form 523” means the Department of Parks and Recreation Historic Resources Inventory Form.

(g) “Folklife” means traditional expressive culture shared within familial, ethnic, occupational, or regional groups and includes, but is not limited to, technical skill, language, music, oral history, ritual, pageantry, and handicraft traditions which are learned orally, by imitation, or in performance, and are generally maintained without benefit of formal instruction or institutional direction. However, “folklife” does not include an area or a site solely on the basis that those activities took place in that area or on that site.

(h) “Historic district” means a definable unified geographic entity that possesses a significant concentration, linkage, or continuity of sites, buildings, structures, or objects united historically or aesthetically by plan or physical development.

(i) “Historical landmark” means any historical resource which is registered as a state historical landmark pursuant to Section 5021.

(j) “Historical resource” includes, but is not limited to, any object, building, structure, site, area, place, record, or manuscript which is historically or archaeologically significant, or is significant in the architectural, engineering, scientific, economic, agricultural, educational, social, political, military, or cultural annals of California.

(k) “Local register of historical resources” means a list of properties officially designated or recognized as historically significant by a local government pursuant to a local ordinance or resolution.

(l) “National Register of Historic Places” means the official federal list of districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American history, architecture, archaeology, engineering, and culture as authorized by the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 470 et seq.).

(m) “Office” means the State Office of Historic Preservation.

(n) “Officer” means the State Historic Preservation Officer.

(o) “Point of historical interest” means any historical resource which is registered as a point of historical interest pursuant to Section 5021.

(p) “State Historic Resources Inventory” means the compilation of all identified, evaluated, and determined historical resources maintained by the office and specifically those resources evaluated in historical resource surveys conducted in accordance with criteria established by the office, formally determined eligible for, or listed in, the National Register of Historic Places, or designated as historical landmarks or points of historical interest.

(q) “Substantial adverse change” means demolition, destruction, relocation, or alteration such that the significance of an historical resource would be impaired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1075, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.2.

(a) The commission consists of nine members appointed by the Governor. The director, in consultation with the State Historic Preservation Officer, shall submit to the Governor a list of persons to be considered for vacant positions on the commission.

(b) (1) Five members shall be recognized professionals in one of each of the following disciplines: history, prehistoric archaeology, historic archaeology, architectural history, and architecture. However, one individual may represent both disciplines of architecture and architectural history and one individual may represent both disciplines of prehistoric archaeology and historic archaeology.

(2) One member shall be knowledgeable in ethnic history.

(3) One member shall be knowledgeable in folklife.

(4) Two members shall represent the public or possess expertise in fields of expertise the Governor deems necessary or desirable to enable the commission to carry out its responsibilities.

(c) Members shall hold office for a term of four years.

(d) Members of the commission on January 1, 1985, shall not be disqualified from serving the remainder of their existing term by reason of the requirements of subdivision (b). However, appointments made to the commission on and after January 1, 1985, shall be made so that the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) are satisfied at the earliest possible time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1289, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.3.

(a) The commission shall meet at least four times per year in places it deems necessary to fulfill its responsibilities. Five members of the commission constitute a quorum.

(b) The commission shall elect annually from its members a chairperson and vice chairperson.

(c) The members of the commission may receive a salary for their services in an amount of fifty dollars ($50) for each day, up to a maximum salary of one hundred dollars ($100) per month. A member of the commission may also be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses which are incurred in the performance of the member’s duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any member of the commission who is also a member of, and is entitled to receive the benefits from, the Legislators’ Retirement System may elect to forego the compensation provided by this section and, if the compensation is foregone, the member shall not have his or her retirement benefits reduced and shall not be required to be reinstated into the retirement system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 942, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.4.

(a) The commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Receive and evaluate applications for, and make recommendations with respect to entries on, the National Register of Historic Places to the officer.

(2) Conduct a statewide inventory and maintain comprehensive records of historical resources pursuant to federal and state law, including, but not limited to, historical landmarks and points of historical interest.

(3) Establish criteria for the recording and preservation of historical resources, and for deletions from historical registers warranted by destruction or damage of a historical resource or other change in conditions.

(4) Develop and adopt criteria for the rehabilitation of historic structures.

(5) Establish policies and guidelines in compliance with state and federal requirements for a comprehensive statewide historical resources plan which includes, but is not limited to, architecture, history, archaeology, and folklife.

(6) Develop and update annually, based upon public hearings and active public participation, the statewide historical resources plan.

(7) Make recommendations to the department, based upon the statewide historical resources plan, including the listing of historical resource projects on a priority basis.

(8) Oversee the administration of the California Register, receive and evaluate nominations to, and cause qualified resources to be listed in, the California Register, and adopt, as necessary, timely revisions of the California Register criteria and procedures as may be advisable.

(9) Recommend to the department the criteria and standards for acceptance of historical buildings, structures, sites, or places for registration as historical landmarks or points of historical interest.

(10) Receive and evaluate applications for registration of structures, sites, or places as historical landmarks or points of historical interest. The commission shall select and designate historical landmarks and points of historical interest that it determines meet the criteria in subdivision (a) of Section 5031. The commission shall maintain a register which identifies historical landmarks and points of historical interest by number and description.
